Tennessee, session 114, HB0639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-9-104, is amended by deleting the
language "within five (5) days" and substituting instead "within ten (10) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0639
000943
- 1 -